Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202185-2904
Public postsecondary institution; information; report; contents; duties.

Each public postsecondary institution in this state shall make information about the Veteran Promise Act available on its official website and electronically submit an annual report to the Clerk of the Legislature on or before December 31, 2022, and on or before December 31 of each year thereafter. Such annual report shall detail the number of applicants under the act, the number of eligible military students and the number of eligible veteran students who are enrolled under the act, the amount of any application fees waived for applicants under the act, and any additional support, service, or assistance that is provided to participating eligible military students and eligible veteran students under the act.

Laws 2021, LB669, § 4.